Utah statutes.
32B-10-201.   Commission's power to issue special use permit.

(1)  Before a person may purchase, use, store, sell, offer for sale, allow consumption, or manufacture an alcoholic product in a manner that requires a special use permit, the person shall first obtain a special use permit in accordance with this chapter.

(2) (a)  The commission may issue a special use permit for the purchase, use, storage, sale, offer for sale, consumption, or manufacture of an alcoholic product for a limited purpose specified by this chapter and the rules of the commission.

(b)  A special use permit authorizes the special use permittee to purchase, use, store, sell, offer for sale, consume, or manufacture an alcoholic product only in the quantity, in a type, and for a purpose stated in the special use permit.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

